District of Columbia statutes.
28:8-101

Short title.

This article may be cited as “Uniform Commercial Code—Investment Securities.”

History

Dec. 30, 1963, 77 Stat. 732, Pub. L. 88-243, § 1
Mar. 16, 1993, D.C. Law 9-196, § 4, 39 DCR 9165
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-240, § 2, 44 DCR 1087

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 28:8-101.
1973 Ed., § 28:8-101.